Montana, session 2025, HB891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Department of public health and human services to investigate reports of waste,
fraud, or abuse -- subpoena power. (1) There is an office of inspector general in the department of public
health and human services. The office of inspector general may issue a subpoena to compel the production of
financial records, documents, records, or data, including information in electronic form, relevant to its
investigation of waste, fraud, or abuse in health care services and public assistance programs administered by
the department.
(2) A subpoena must be signed by the director of the department of public health and human
services and the inspector general.
Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $5,000 from the general fund to the department of
public health and human services for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to implement the provisions of
[section 1].
Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
53, chapter 2, part 1, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 2, part 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 891
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 891
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 891
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 891, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 891
INTRODUCED BY B. MERCER
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING LAWS RELATED TO THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN
SERVICES; AUTHORIZING THE OFFICE OF INSPECTOR GENERAL TO ISSUE SUBPOENAS TO COMPEL
PRODUCTION OF CERTAIN RECORDS RELEVANT TO INVESTIGATIONS OF WASTE, FRAUD, OR ABUSE;
PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”